Mississippi, session 2026, SB2954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Lee County, to defray expenses associated with the renovation of the polling precinct at Pratts Community Center and with the improvement to Pratts Community Center property, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 250,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, the funds must first be used to renovate the polling precinct.  Any remaining funds may be used for improvement to Pratts Community Center property. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.